Wisconsin, session 2025, SB151.
do enact as follows:SB151,13Section 1. 108.09 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB151,2,44108.09 (1) Filing. Claims for benefits shall be filed pursuant to department 5rules. Each employer that is notified of a benefit claim shall promptly inform the 6department in writing as to any eligibility question in objection to such claim 7together with the reasons for the objection. The department shall allow an 1employer no less than 12 business days to respond to an initial request from the 2department for information in response to a benefit claim. The department may 3also obtain information from the employee concerning the employee’s eligibility, 4employment or wages.SB151,25Section 2. Initial applicability.SB151,2,76(1) This act first applies to requests for information related to claims filed for 7the week beginning on or after the effective date of this subsection.SB151,2,88